Maine, session 132, LD912.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §102, sub-§20-B, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 205, §2, is
amended to read:
B. The entity's tenants; or
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §102, sub-§20-B, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 205, §2, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
C. Commercial or industrial consumers located on the property where the entity is
located or on abutting property; or
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §102, sub-§20-B, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. Commercial or industrial consumers located on a commercial or industrial site
within the control area of the New England independent system operator and located
in a municipality north of the Town of Chester that was served by the entity or its
predecessor without using the transmission and distribution plant of a public utility
prior to December 31, 2018. The exception under this paragraph does not apply if
more than 25% of the nameplate capacity of the entity is used to serve data centers
Page 1 - 132LR1873(03)

located on the commercial or industrial site. For the purposes of this paragraph, "data
center" means any facility in the State, which may be a freestanding structure or a
facility within a larger structure, that primarily contains electronic equipment used to
process, store and transmit digital information that uses environmental control
equipment to maintain the proper conditions for the operation of electronic equipment.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR1873(03)